Louisiana, session 2026, SB158.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:260.52 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§460.52. Exemptions
The provisions of this Part shall not apply to any entity contracted with the
Louisiana Department of Health to provide fiscal intermediary services in processing
claims of the health care providers any healthcare provider.